California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(b) The Department of Finance shall approve or modify the assumptions underlying all estimates within 15 working days of their submission. If the Department of Finance does not approve or modify the assumptions by such date, the assumptions as presented by the submitting department shall be deemed to be accepted by the Department of Finance as of that date.

(c) Assumptions shall be released to the legislative fiscal committees immediately following approval or modification by the Department of Finance. The department shall identify those premises to which either of the following apply:

(1) Have been discontinued since the previous estimate was submitted.

(2) Have been placed in the basic cost line of the estimate package.

(d) The department shall submit an estimate of expenditures for each of the categorical aid programs to the Department of Finance by November 1 of each year and April 20 of the following year. Each estimate shall contain a concise statement identifying applicable estimate components, such as caseload, unit cost, implementation date, whether it is a new or continuing premise, and other assumptions necessary to support the estimate. The submittal shall include a projection of the fiscal impact of each of the approved assumptions related to a regulatory, statutory, or policy change; a detailed explanation of any changes to the base estimate projections from the previous estimate; and a projection of the fiscal impact of such change to the base estimate.

(e) (1) The department shall submit to the Department of Finance, as part of the estimates compiled November 1
 each year, a brief narrative description of the methodological steps employed in arriving at all of the following:

(A) The basic grant costs for the Aid to Families with Dependent Children program and State Supplementary Program.

(B) The basic administrative costs for the Aid to Families with Dependent Children program and CalFresh.

(C) All cost estimates for the In-Home Supportive Services program.

(D) Any cost estimate for new regulations or legislation which exceeds 2 percent of the total cost of the affected program.

(2) These methodological discussions shall be forwarded to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the fiscal committees along with the November 1 annual estimates of
 expenditures. In addition, the department shall, upon request, develop and make available brief written narratives of the steps taken to arrive at specified estimates. Copies of the written narratives, working papers, and data employed in the construction of any estimate used to prepare the Governor’s Budget shall be made available by the State Department of Social Services upon request to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee or the Department of Finance.

(f) In the event that the methodological steps employed in arriving at those estimates in May differ from those used in November of the preceding year, the department shall submit a brief narrative description of the revised methodology to the Department of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the fiscal committees, along with other materials included in the annual May Revision of expenditure estimates.

(g) The
 estimates of average monthly caseloads, average monthly grants, total estimated expenditures (including administrative expenditures and savings or costs associated with all regulatory or statutory changes), as well as all supporting data provided by the department or developed independently by the Department of Finance, shall be made available to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee immediately following approval by the Department of Finance. These departmental estimates, assumptions, and other supporting data as have been prepared shall, however, be forwarded annually to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee not later than January 10 and May 15 by the department if this information has not been released earlier by the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 27.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10614.5.

Upon the request of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Department of Finance shall post on its Internet Web site data on monthly caseloads and expenditures for public social services programs supervised by the State Department of Social Services. In addition, this data shall be incorporated into and made an integral part of the budget data system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 192.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10615.

California’s 58 counties vary greatly in their welfare problems, and therefore they should not be treated alike in the supervision of welfare programs. The Legislature hereby declares its intent that the department examine the extent of state control needed over county operations, with a view toward eliminating excessive rigidity in procedure; the state should differentiate between those counties which need general direction as opposed to tight supervision.

Within these guidelines, the department shall aid county departments in establishing economic, efficient, and effective methods of operation, including, but not limited to, advising and consulting with county departments with regard to the introduction of electronic computer and data processing systems, personnel utilization, office controls, centralized purchasing, centralized warehousing, writing of specifications, and examination of materials and equipment purchased by county departments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1646.)
-------------------------------------------

10616.

The department shall formulate plans for the recruitment, utilization, and training of volunteers to assist in performing services and other duties for the county public social services for the purpose of improving participation in the county public welfare programs. Such plans shall not become effective in a county until approved by a resolution adopted by the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10617.

In fixing rates for out-of-home care in nonmedical facilities authorized to provide care for recipients of public assistance, the department shall establish a rate plan providing a differential in rate allowances related to the differences in the degree of care required by recipients. The rate structure shall reflect differences in accordance with the specific types of services that are rendered by the facility in providing care for recipients.

In establishing the rate structure, the department shall strive to improve and increase the range of services provided by out-of-home facilities in order that recipients may receive the type of care they require at a reasonable cost.

In order to keep people in their own homes whenever possible, the department shall develop an expanded range of home care services that will make it possible for people to remain in their own homes or homes of their own choosing with safety. The department shall give particular attention to the training of homemakers to be employed directly by county departments.

In developing plans for the recruitment and training of homemakers, the department shall give priority to the training and employment of recipients of public assistance. Emphasis shall be given to arranging hours of work and training so that parents with primary responsibility for the care of children can participate in the program, to the extent not in conflict with federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10618.

Funding of Section 10617 is subject to the provisions of Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 10100) of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1235.   Note: Repeal conditions in Sec. 14 of Ch. 1235 failed.)
-------------------------------------------

10618.5.

(a) The county welfare department shall send any CalFresh applicant who is determined to be eligible for CalFresh benefits and who does not indicate on his or her application an interest in enrolling in the Medi-Cal program a copy of the notice developed pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) (1) Each county welfare department shall develop a notice informing individuals identified pursuant to subdivision (a) that they may be entitled to receive Medi-Cal benefits and requesting their permission to use the information in the CalFresh recipient’s case file to make a determination of eligibility for the Medi-Cal program.

(2) The notice shall also include a request for permission to forward the information in the CalFresh recipient’s case file to the Healthy Families Program administrator for eligibility determination if the individual is determined to be eligible to participate in the Medi-Cal program with a share of cost, or is determined to be ineligible for Medi-Cal.

(3) To apply for medical assistance under the Medi-Cal program, the CalFresh recipient shall sign, date, and return the notice requesting that an eligibility determination be made.

(4) Upon receipt of the notice, the county welfare department shall make an eligibility determination by utilizing the information in the CalFresh recipient’s case file or paper application. The Medi-Cal application date shall be the date the notice is received by the county welfare
 department.

(5) If the CalFresh case file does not include sufficient information to establish Medi-Cal program eligibility, the county welfare department shall request, either orally or in writing, additional information from the CalFresh recipient.

(6) The notice shall be written in culturally and linguistically appropriate language and at an appropriate literacy level. The notice shall include information on the Medi-Cal program and the Healthy Families Program, a telephone number that CalFresh recipients may call for additional information, and a prepaid means of returning the notice to the county welfare department to begin the eligibility determination process.

(c) If an individual identified in subdivision (a) or (b) is determined to be eligible to participate in the Medi-Cal program with a share of cost, or
 is determined to be ineligible for Medi-Cal, information pertinent to the CalFresh recipient’s eligibility for the Healthy Families Program shall be forwarded by the county welfare department to the Healthy Families Program statewide administrator for immediate processing. If there is insufficient information to establish Healthy Families Program eligibility, the administrator shall request, either orally or in writing, additional information from the CalFresh recipient.

(d) Counties shall include the cost of implementing this section in their annual administrative budget requests to the State Department of Health Care Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 28.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10618.6.

(a) (1) When a child in a foster care placement reaches his or her 14th birthday, and each year thereafter, while the child is under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, the county welfare department, county probation department, or, if an automated process is available, the State Department of Social Services, shall inquire of each of the three major credit reporting agencies as to whether the child has any consumer credit history.

(2) If the State Department of Social Services makes the inquiry, it shall notify the county welfare department or county probation department in the county having jurisdiction over the child of the results of that inquiry.

(3) Pursuant to the federal Child and Family Services Improvement and Innovation Act (Public Law 112-34) and the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.), if an inquiry performed pursuant to this subdivision indicates that a child has a consumer credit history with any major credit reporting agency, the responsible county welfare department or county probation department shall request a consumer credit report from that credit reporting agency.

(b) For a nonminor dependent, the county welfare department or county probation department shall assist the young adult, on a yearly basis while the nonminor dependent is under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, with requesting the consumer credit report from each of the three major credit reporting agencies, pursuant to the free annual disclosure provision of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681
 et seq.).

(c) The county social worker or county probation officer shall ensure that the child or nonminor dependent receives assistance with interpreting the consumer credit report and resolving any inaccuracies. The assistance may include, but is not limited to, referring the youth to a governmental or nonprofit agency that provides consumer credit services. This section does not require the social worker or probation officer to be the individual providing the direct assistance with interpreting the consumer credit disclosure or resolving the inaccuracies.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, in order to make an inquiry or to request a consumer credit report for youth pursuant to this section, the county welfare department, county probation department, or, if an automated process is available, the State Department of Social Services may release necessary information to a credit
 reporting agency.

(e) No later than February 1, 2016, the State Department of Social Services shall provide information to the Assembly Committee on Budget, the Senate Budget and Fiscal Review Committee, and the appropriate legislative policy committees regarding the implementation of this section, including, but not limited to, any state and county barriers to obtaining credit reports as required by the federal Child and Family Services Improvement and Innovation Act (Public Law 112-34).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 425, Sec. 20.   (SB 794)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10618.7.

(a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the Foster Outreach and Support for Tax Education Readiness (FOSTER) Act.

(b) (1) By no later than July 30, 2026, the department shall issue guidance to county welfare departments and juvenile probation departments with information to support best practices for encouraging nonminor dependents to file state and federal income tax returns and to access the state foster youth tax credit, as described in Section 17052.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) This guidance shall be updated as needed and reissued no less than every two years thereafter.

(3) The guidance issued pursuant to this subdivision shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The eligibility requirements for the foster youth tax credit and the maximum foster youth tax credit available pursuant to Section 17502.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(B) An advisement of the county responsibilities described in subdivision (c).

(C) Outreach strategies to increase awareness among nonminor dependents and former foster youth about the foster youth tax credit.

(D) Resources from the Internal Revenue Service internet website for identifying local Volunteer Income Tax Assistance providers.

(E) Any promising strategies developed by individual
 counties to communicate with the eligible population about resources available to assist them with tax filing, including county-hosted workshops for foster youth to educate and assist them with filing their taxes, in partnership with a local Volunteer Income Tax Assistance internet website by the Internal Revenue Service or community-based organizations.

(F) Identification of resources available through nonprofit organizations for improving knowledge about the foster youth tax credit.

(G) Identification of resources available through other state agencies to aid with communication or disseminating the information described in subparagraph (A) and subparagraphs (C) to (F), inclusive.

(c) (1) The county welfare department and juvenile probation department shall annually send by mail to every nonminor dependent
 information about filing state and federal income tax returns and the foster youth tax credit.

(2) The mailing pursuant to this subdivision shall occur between November 1 and January 31, inclusive, of each year.

(3) The mailing pursuant to this subdivision shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(A) Eligibility requirements for the foster youth tax credit pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17052.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(B) The maximum amount of the foster youth tax credit for the forthcoming tax season pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 17052.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(C) An advisement that the nonminor
 dependent may be eligible for other tax credits, including, but not limited to, state and federal earned income tax credits, the federal Child Tax Credit and state Young Child Tax Credit, the federal Child and Dependent Care Credit and state Child and Dependent Care Expenses Credit, the federal American Opportunity Tax Credit, the federal Lifetime Learning Credit, and the state Renters’ Credit.

(D) The location of and how to set up an appointment with or otherwise receive services from local Volunteer Income Tax Assistance internet websites certified by the Internal Revenue Service within the county where the nonminor dependent resides, or, if none are available, those located in nearby counties, and any workshops, as described in subparagraph (E) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).

(E) Resources to assist the nonminor dependent with self-filing federal and state tax returns at
 no cost.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 230, Sec. 1.   (SB 624)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10618.8.

(a) Utilizing no more than ten million five hundred thousand dollars ($10,500,000) of the combined one-time funds appropriated in the Budget Act of 2021 and the Budget Act of 2022 for the purposes of the CalWORKs Housing Support Program (Article 3.3 (commencing with Section 11330) of Chapter 2 of Part 3), the Home Safe Program (Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 15770) of Part 3), the Bringing Families Home Program (Article 6 (commencing with Section 16523) of Chapter 5 of Part 4), and the Housing and Disability Income Advocacy Program (Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 18999) of Part 6), the department may contract with one or more vendors for the purpose of establishing a system to collect data and track outcomes, and may, in consultation with the Legislature, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, advocates for clients, and housing and homelessness stakeholders, contract with one or more independent evaluation and research agencies to evaluate the impacts of each of these
 programs, which may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Outcomes for recipients, including achievement of housing stability.

(2) Demographic information about recipients.

(3) The likelihood of future homelessness and housing instability among recipients.

(4) Program costs and benefits.

(b) Program evaluation efforts described in subdivision (a) shall complement evaluation efforts specified in subdivision (g) of Section 15771.

(c) Utilizing no more than ten million five hundred thousand dollars ($10,500,000) of the one-time funds appropriated in the Budget Act of 2021, and no more than ten million five hundred thousand dollars ($10,500,000) of the one-time funds appropriated in the Budget Act of 2022 in a manner consistent with the purpose of this subdivision, for the purposes of the CalWORKs Housing Support Program (Article 3.3 (commencing with Section 11330) of Chapter 2 of Part 3), the Home Safe Program (Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 15770) of Part 3), the Bringing Families Home Program (Article 6 (commencing with Section 16523) of Chapter 5 of Part 4), and the Housing and Disability Income Advocacy Program (Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 18999) of Part 6), the department may, in consultation with the Legislature, County Welfare Directors Association of California, advocates for clients, and housing and homelessness stakeholders, contract with one or more entities to provide technical assistance for each of these programs, which may include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Implementing and administering programs that incorporate evidence-based and emerging promising practices in homeless assistance and homelessness prevention that support the advancement of racial equity.

(2) Scaling housing navigation and location services.

(3) Coordination and integration between the social services department, homelessness system of care, and health systems.

(4) Streamlining administrative efficiencies.

(5) Data collection and reporting, outcomes monitoring, and continuous
 quality improvement.

(d) On or before February 1 of each year, the department shall report annually to the Legislature, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on all of the following:

(1) Detailed information on the dollar amounts and entities for contracts entered into and other activities funded pursuant to the amounts authorized in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c).

(2) Data regarding implementation for each of the programs specified in subdivision (a), including all of the following:

(A) All actual expenditures
 against the total appropriations provided, noting funds remaining and expenditure deadlines. If the program is subject to a regional allocation approach, this information shall be provided by region.

(B) For the state as a whole and on a regional basis, the number of requests for service, where available, the number of families or individuals approved to receive program services as applicable to each program, and net expenditures. For the Community Care Expansion Program (Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 18999.97) of Part 6), the department shall report the number of awards funded, the amount of these awards, the number of proposed beds to be expanded through the expansion component of the program, and the number of existing beds to be preserved through the preservation component of the program.

(C) For the state as a whole and on a regional basis, the housing status of families or individuals, as applicable to each program, at exit from the program, including those who exit to permanent housing, temporary housing, homelessness, unknown, or other exit destinations, including institutions, as available by program.

(D) For the state as a whole and on a regional basis, the relevant information reported to the department historically across at least the previous seven fiscal years to ascertain and display trend data reported pursuant to subparagraphs (B) and (C). For programs that have not been operational for at least seven years, the historical information shall be provided for as long as relevant program data was being reported to the department.

(E) Trend information across California, even if informal and by observation, about the increasing or decreasing of housing and homelessness needs for families, adults with disabilities, and older adults.

(e) For purposes of subdivision (d), “regional” and “regional basis” shall, at a minimum, include information about all of the following:

(1) County of Los Angeles.

(2) Bay area: Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, Napa, San
 Francisco, San Mateo, Santa Clara, Solano, and Sonoma.

(3) Southern California: Counties of Imperial, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, and Ventura.

(4) San Joaquin Valley: Counties of Fresno, Kern, Kings, Madera, Merced, San Joaquin, Stanislaus, and Tulare.

(5) Sacramento area: Counties of El Dorado, Placer, Sacramento, Sutter, Yolo, and Yuba.

(6) Central coast: Counties of Monterey, San Benito, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, Santa Cruz.

(7) Balance of the state: Counties of Alpine, Amador, Butte, Calaveras, Colusa, Del Norte, Glenn, Humboldt, Inyo, Lake, Lassen, Mariposa, Mendocino, Modoc, Mono, Nevada, Plumas, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Tehama, Trinity, and Tuolumne.

(f) For purposes of implementing this section, contracts entered into or amended shall be exempt from all of the following:

(1) Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) The personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(3) Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting
 Manual.

(4) Notwithstanding Section 11546 of the Government Code, from the review or approval of any division of the Department of Technology, upon approval from the Department of Finance.

(5) From the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(g) (1) If any provisions of tribal law, tribal governance, tribal charter, or difference in tribal entity or agency legal structure would cause a violation of, would fail to satisfy, or would create inconsistencies with, program requirements for the CalWORKs Housing Support Program (Article 3.3 (commencing with Section 11330) of Chapter
 2 of Part 3), the Home Safe Program (Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 15770) of Part 3), the Bringing Families Home Program (Article 6 (commencing with Section 16523) of Chapter 5 of Part 4), the Housing and Disability Income Advocacy Program (Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 18999) of Part 6), or the Community Care Expansion Program (Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 18999.97) of Part 6), any regulatory or other program requirement set forth by the department may be modified or waived, at the discretion of the department, as necessary to ensure program compatibility or to avoid an unnecessary administrative burden on tribes.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not be applied or interpreted to permit the modification or waiver of any federal regulation or statute.

(3) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific paragraph (1) without taking any regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 34.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10618.9.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the procedure described in this section is sufficient to meet any applicable due process requirements for the programs described in this section. Furthermore, for the purposes of those programs, it is the intent of the Legislature to promote the fair and expeditious resolution of disputes through the creation of complaint resolution processes and to establish minimum standards for the development of individualized written housing plans.

(b) (1) Counties opting to participate in any of the following programs shall have written program policies and make them available to the public, including on the internet website of the county, and implement and conduct county-level
 complaint resolution processes according to minimum requirements developed by the department:

(A) The CalWORKs Housing Support Program (Article 3.3 (commencing with Section 11330) of Chapter 2 of Part 3).

(B) The Home Safe Program (Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 15770) of Part 3).

(C) The Bringing Families Home Program (Article 6 (commencing with Section 16523) of Chapter 5 of Part 4).

(D) The Housing and Disability Income Advocacy Program (Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 18999) of Part 6).

(2) The minimum requirements developed by the department pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include all of the following elements:

(A) A statewide standardized notice informing applicants for, and recipients of, the programs of the county-level complaint resolution process and state hearings process pursuant to subdivision (c), including all associated timelines, the right to submit a complaint within 30 calendar days from the date of the county action that gave rise to the complaint, and what constitutes good cause, as defined by future guidance to be developed by the department, for submitting a complaint after 30 calendar days. This information shall be provided in writing at the time of enrollment and discontinuance from the program, and shall meet all language and accessibility requirements, as prescribed by the department. The statewide standardized notice, which may be modified by counties to reflect their county-level complaint resolution process, shall be developed in consultation with stakeholders, including advocates for program applicants and recipients, representatives of labor organizations, the County Welfare
 Directors Association of California (CWDA), and legislative staff.

(B) An objective decisionmaker who is a neutral person not directly involved in the county action that gave rise to the complaint and who has knowledge of the program’s written policies, the program requirements, and departmental guidance.

(C) The right for any party to the complaint to present information in support of the complaint. Any party to the complaint shall also have the right to request a meeting to present information in person, by phone, or virtually, and to be represented by someone of their choosing. The meeting shall be held within 30 calendar days of receipt of a complaint.

(D) A written decision describing the outcome of the complaint, including information about the complaint, the date of the decision, the basis of the county’s
 decision, including the relevant policies, laws, and facts, county contact information for any questions about the decision, and notice of the right to appeal the decision to a state hearing pursuant to subdivision (c). The decision shall be issued within the following timelines:

(i) If no meeting is requested, a written decision shall be issued by the county no later than 30 calendar days following receipt of a complaint.

(ii) If a meeting is requested, a written decision shall be issued within 15 working days from the date of the meeting.

(E) Any other criteria or clarifying guidance determined by the department, in collaboration with CWDA, counties, and advocates for program applicants and recipients.

(3) The department shall develop program guidance
 on a procedure for counties to inform recipients in writing of housing-related services and financial assistance being provided to the recipient, which shall include advance notice when housing-related services or financial assistance will be reduced or discontinued, and which may include electronic copies. This guidance shall include, at a minimum, all of the following elements:

(A) Counties shall provide recipients with an individualized written housing plan that shall meet all of the following requirements:

(i) Be developed by the county in coordination with the recipient, when possible, and consistent with Housing First requirements specified in Section 8255, to meet the recipient’s specified housing-related goals.

(ii) Describe the housing-related services and financial assistance being provided to a recipient
 and specify the start and expiration dates, as applicable, within the plan.

(iii) Be provided to the recipient upon enrollment and updated when the recipient’s housing-related services or financial assistance change and as specified by the department.

(B) If the recurring housing-related services or financial assistance described in a current written housing plan will be reduced or discontinued before its planned expiration date stated in the plan, the county shall provide the recipient with an updated housing plan before the reduction or discontinuance is effective that explains why the change is being made and when the change will take effect. The updated housing plan shall include accessible and easily understandable information about possible alternative and available housing supports and services.

(C) A formal
 process for discontinuing a recipient from a program that includes providing the recipient with a written description of the reason for the discontinuance and when it will occur.

(D) The county shall document in an updated written housing plan provided to the recipient when the reduction or discontinuance of housing-related services or financial assistance is a result of the county closing the program, including closure or caseload reduction due to insufficient program funding.

(E) Any other criteria or clarifying guidance determined by the department in collaboration with CWDA, counties, and advocates for program applicants and recipients.

(4) A county participating in a program shall amend existing processes for those programs to satisfy the minimum requirements developed by the department pursuant to this
 subdivision if the existing processes do not meet the minimum requirements. If the county does not have existing processes for those programs, the county shall adopt processes for those programs that satisfy the minimum requirements developed by the department pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) If a recipient is dissatisfied with a decision issued pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), or if the county fails to provide a county complaint process or timely issue a decision as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the recipient shall have the right to file a request within 30 calendar days with the department for a state administrative hearing conducted by an administrative law judge for county actions resulting in a reduction or discontinuance of housing-related services or financial assistance, including discontinuance from a program, subject to all of the following:

(1) (A) An administrative hearing decision may determine that a county action is correct or incorrect.

(B) If a county action for discontinuance from a program is determined incorrect, the decision shall order the county to reenroll the recipient into the program, subject to the availability of funds for that program.

(C) If a county action for reduction or discontinuance of housing-related services or financial assistance is determined incorrect, the decision shall either order the county to continue to provide the housing-related services or financial assistance, as stated in the previous housing plan in effect immediately prior to the proposed county action for reduction or discontinuance of housing-related services or financial assistance that gave rise to the complaint, or order the county to
 reevaluate the housing-related services or financial assistance provided to the recipient when the previous housing plan no longer suits the needs of the recipient or if the housing-related services or financial assistance is no longer available within the county program, subject to guidance from the department and the availability of funds for that program.

(D) The county shall carry out all orders in accordance with its written policies, the program requirements, and departmental guidance. The county shall notify the recipient and state hearings upon complying with the decision as set forth in Section 22-071.1 (h) and 22-078.2 of Chapter 22-000 of Division 22 of the State Department of Social Services Manual of Policies and Procedures.

(2) (A) An administrative hearing decision may determine that the county failed to provide a county-level complaint
 resolution process, as required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), or that the county failed to issue a timely decision, as required by subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(B) If an administrative hearing decision finds that the county failed to issue a timely decision, as required by subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the decision shall order the county to issue a decision within 15 calendar days.

(C) If an administrative hearing decision finds that the county failed to provide a county-level complaint resolution process, the administrative law judge shall render a decision consistent with this section and guidance issued by the department.

(3) (A) For any program specified under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), a county shall notify the department in
 writing at least 30 calendar days in advance of programwide caseload reductions due to insufficient funding, and of any temporary or permanent interruption or end to a program’s services and operations, for any reason, including fully spending the given allocation.

(B) There shall be no right to an administrative hearing for county actions if the county has provided notice to the recipients that their housing-related services or financial assistance will be reduced or discontinued, as set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), in the following circumstances:

(i) The program under which the recipient is receiving housing-related services or financial assistance has closed or is closing permanently or temporarily, and the county has provided notice to the department, as required by subparagraph (A).

(ii) A county
 determination to reduce its program caseload due to insufficient funding.

(iii) For temporary program reductions or suspensions to program operations due to unexpected and extenuating circumstances that are publicly disclosed, including on the internet website of the county, and approved by the department.

(4) In the event that program funding is depleted, as defined by department guidance, or the program closes while an administrative hearing is pending, and the administrative law judge is made aware that the funding has been depleted or the program has closed, the matter shall be administratively dismissed without a hearing.

(5) Local assistance funds shall be used to implement this subdivision if an appropriation for administrative resources for the purpose of implementing this subdivision is not provided by the
 Legislature, subject to all of the following:

(A) The department shall prioritize any available funding for state set asides from local assistance allocations, or other available state administrative funding, such as for evaluation or training, appropriated prior to the Budget Act of 2025 for the purpose of implementing this subdivision.

(B) To the extent additional state operation funds are needed, any local assistance funds specifically set aside for state administrative costs for the program, pursuant to and consistent with Provisions 14, 15, and 16 of Item 5180-151-0001 of the Budget Act of 2025, may be used to implement this subdivision.

(C) During the first fiscal year that this subdivision is implemented, at least nine hundred fifty one thousand dollars ($951,000) in local assistance funds set aside for state
 administrative costs shall be available for this purpose. The department shall notify CWDA and advocates for program applicants and recipients on any updated estimates for state operations funding needed for implementing this subdivision in a future fiscal year. Any changes to local assistance funds needed for implementing this subdivision in a future fiscal year shall be reported to the Legislature.

(D) Commencing February 1, 2028, and each year thereafter, the department shall report to the Legislature on the counties’ cost of implementing county-level complaint resolution processes and participating in state hearings. The reporting process shall be developed by the department in consultation with CWDA, and shall include, but not be limited to, the number of county-level complaints, the number of state hearing requests, and the number of cases which proceeded to state hearings when available.
